Utah statutes.
34-28-7.   Payment at more frequent intervals permitted -- Agreements to contravene chapter prohibited unless approved by division.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall in any way limit or prohibit the payment of wages or compensation at more frequent intervals, or in greater amounts or in full when or before due, but no provisions of this chapter can in any way be contravened or set aside by a mutual agreement unless the agreement is approved by the division.

